South Dakota, session 2026, HB1230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 61-5-29 be AMENDED:
61-5-29. Employers required by this title to pay contributions, except employers
pursuant to chapter 61-5A, that reimburse the unemployment compensation trust fund
for benefits paid in lieu of contributions, shall, unless opting out pursuant to section 2 of
this Act, also pay an employer's investment in South Dakota's future fee, hereinafter
referred to as the investment fee, on wages as defined by this title. The investment fee
rate for employers subject to this section, not eligible for experience rating, as provided
for in § 61-5-24, must be is seventy-hundredths percent through calendar year 2006 and
fifty-five hundredths percent on and after January 1, 2007. If an employer subject to this
section is eligible for experience rating, the employer's reserve ratio must be determined
pursuant to § 61-5-25.3 through calendar year 2017, pursuant to § 61-5-25.4 for calendar
years 2018 and 2019, pursuant to § 61-5-25.5 for calendar year 2020 through calendar
year 2023, pursuant to § 61-5-25.6 for calendar year 2024 through calendar year 2025,
and pursuant to § 61-5-25.7 for calendar year 2026 and each year thereafter, and the
employer's investment fee rate must be the rate appearing in column "A" on the same
line the employer's reserve ratio appears in column "B" of the following rate schedule:
Column "A" Column "B"
Investment Fee Rate Reserve Ratio
0.53% Less than 1.00%
0.50% 1.00% and Less than 1.20%
0.40% 1.20% and Less than 1.30%
0.30% 1.30% and Less than 1.40%
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.508.14 2 1230
0.20% 1.40% and Less than 1.50%
0.10% 1.50% and Less than 1.60%
0.00% 1.60% and Over
The Notwithstanding section 2 of this Act, the terms and conditions of this title that
apply to the payment and collection of contributions also apply to the payment and
collection of the investment fee. The department shall deposit the proceeds from the
investment fee in the clearing account of the unemployment compensation fund for
clearance only. The proceeds may not become part of the fund. After clearance, the
department must shall deposit the money derived from the investment fee payments, less
refunds made pursuant to the provisions of this title, in the employer's investment in
South Dakota's future fund, as provided for in § 61-5-29.1. No investment fee payment
may be credited to the employer's experience-rating account, nor may the payment be
deducted in whole or in part by any employer from the wages of individuals in its employ.
The investment fee rate may not be increased over the applicable 1987 investment
fee rate for any employer with a positive balance in the employer's experience-rating
account on the computation date, as established in rules promulgated by the secretary of
labor and regulation, in accordance with chapter 1-26, for the current year and the year
preceding the current year.
The investment rates provided in this section apply to and are retroactive to taxable
wages paid on and after January 1, 1993.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 61-5:
The department shall develop a form for opting in to or out of paying the employer's
investment in South Dakota's future fee created by § 61-5-29. The form must fit on one
sheet of paper no bigger than 8.5 inches by eleven inches.
The department shall publish the form on its website and distribute at the beginning
of each calendar quarter a physical copy of the form to each employer subject to § 61-5-
29, until the employer submits a completed form to the department. The department shall
provide methods for submitting the form either physically or electronically.
The department shall deem all employers that have not opted in to paying the fee
as having opted out, regardless of whether they have submitted a completed form. An
employer that has opted out of paying the fee is not required to pay the fee and is not
subject to the terms and conditions of this title that apply to the payment and collection
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.508.14 3 1230
of the fee. If an employer opts out of paying the fee, the department may not impose any
penalty or other consequence on the employer for nonpayment of the fee.
If any employer opts in to paying the fee, the employer is then subject to the terms
and conditions of this title that apply to the payment and collection of the fee at the
beginning of the following calendar quarter after the department receives the form
indicating the employer has opted in.
If an employer that has opted in wants to subsequently opt out, the employer must
submit a new form to the department. An employer that previously opted in is no longer
required to pay the fee, and is no longer subject to the terms and conditions of this title
that apply to the payment and collection of the fee, at the beginning of the following
calendar quarter after the department receives the form indicating the employer has opted
out.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.